test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-niiqem_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - nīʼem: # Noun 142 'eng /est lehm/fin' - full paradigm
     nīʼem+N+Sg+Nom: [nīʼem, nīem]
     nīʼem+N+Sg+Gen: [nīʼem, nīem]
     nīʼem+N+Sg+Par: [nīʼemõ, nīemõ]
     nīʼem+N+Sg+Dat: [nīʼemõn, nīemõn]
     nīʼem+N+Sg+Ins: [nīʼemõks, nīemõks]
     nīʼem+N+Sg+Ill: [nīʼemõ, nīemõ]
     nīʼem+N+Sg+Ela: [nīʼemõst, nīemõst]
     nīʼem+N+Pl+Nom: [nīʼemõd, nīemõd]
     nīʼem+N+Pl+Gen: [nīʼemõd, nīemõd]
     nīʼem+N+Pl+Par: [nīʼemidi, nīemidi]
     nīʼem+N+Pl+Dat: [nīʼemõdõn, nīemõdõn]
     nīʼem+N+Pl+Ins: [nīʼemõdõks, nīemõdõks]
     nīʼem+N+Pl+Ill: [nīʼemiž, nīemiž]
     nīʼem+N+Pl+Ela: [nīʼemist, nīemist]
